Louisiana, session 2026, HB1121.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1300.81 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1300.81. Exercise of conscience for healthcare institutions, healthcare payors, and
licensed healthcare professionals
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Adverse action" includes but is not limited to all of the following:
(a) Termination, suspension, demotion, or reduction in compensation.
(b) Revocation, suspension, or restriction of professional licensure.
(c) Placement on unpaid leave.
(d) Material alteration of employment terms.
(e) Retaliatory investigation or disciplinary proceedings.
(2) "Conscience" means the ethical, moral, or religious beliefs or principles
held by a licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or healthcare payor.
With respect to persons who are institutions, corporations, or other legal entities,
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1118 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1121
"conscience" is determined by reference to that entity’s governing documents
including but not limited to published ethical, moral, or religious guidelines or
directives, mission statements, constitutions, articles of incorporation, bylaws,
policies, or regulations.
(3) "Discrimination" means an adverse action, including but not limited to
any penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory action taken against, or a threat of adverse
action communicated to, a licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution,
or healthcare payor as a result of the refusal of the licensed healthcare professional,
healthcare institution, or healthcare payor to participate in a healthcare service on the
basis of conscience. "Discrimination" does not include the negotiation or purchase
of insurance or a healthcare service by a nongovernmental entity or individual, the
refusal to use or purchase insurance or a healthcare service by a nongovernmental
entity or individual, or a healthcare institution’s good faith effort to accommodate
a licensed healthcare professional’s, healthcare institution’s, or healthcare payor’s
exercise of conscience.
(4) "Healthcare institution" means an organization, corporation, partnership,
association, agency, network, sole proprietorship, joint venture, or other entity that
provides a healthcare service.
(5) "Healthcare payor" means an employer; a health plan; a management
services organization; any entity, including a healthcare service corporation, health
maintenance organization, or similar corporation or organization, or an employer
offering self-insurance, that provides a health benefit plan; or any other entity that
pays for or arranges for payment for, in whole or in part, a healthcare service.
(6) "Healthcare service" means medical research and medical care provided
to a patient or client at any time during the patient’s or client’s course of treatment
including but not limited to testing; diagnosis; record making; referral; prescribing,
dispensing, or administering any drug, medication, or device; therapy or counseling;
and preparation or arrangement for a surgical procedure.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1118 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1121
(7) "Licensed healthcare professional" means a person who facilitates or
participates or who is asked to facilitate or participate in a healthcare service,
including but not limited to a health-related professional licensed by a board, and any
other person licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of
this state to administer a healthcare service in the ordinary course of business or in
the practice of a profession. "Licensed healthcare professional" includes any student
enrolled in an educational institution who is a prospective licensed healthcare
professional.
(8) "Participate in a healthcare service" means to provide, perform, assist
with, facilitate, refer for, provide counseling for, advise with regard to, admit for the
purposes of providing, or take part in a healthcare service in any way.
B.(1)(a) A licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or
healthcare payor has the right not to participate in or pay for a healthcare service that
violates the licensed healthcare professional’s, healthcare institution’s, or healthcare
payor’s conscience. This Paragraph shall not be construed to waive or modify a duty
a licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or healthcare payor may
have to participate in or pay for a healthcare service that does not violate the licensed
healthcare professional’s conscience.
(b) A licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or healthcare
payor who refuses to participate in a healthcare service in accordance with this
Section shall not be discriminated against for the licensed healthcare professional’s,
healthcare institution’s, or healthcare payor’s exercise of conscience.
(2) A healthcare payor shall not decline to pay for a healthcare service due
to a licensed healthcare professional’s, healthcare institution’s, or healthcare payor’s
refusal to participate in a healthcare service in accordance with this Section if the
healthcare payor is contractually obligated to pay for the healthcare service.
(3) This Section shall not be construed to relieve a healthcare institution of
the requirement to provide emergency medical services to individuals as required in
accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395dd.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1118 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1121
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary, a
licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or healthcare payor that holds
itself out to the public as religion-based, states in the entity’s governing documents
that the entity has a religious purpose or mission, and that has internal operating
policies or procedures that implement the entity’s religious beliefs has the right to
make employment, staffing, contracting, and admitting privilege decisions consistent
with the entity’s religious beliefs.
C.(1) A licensed healthcare professional, healthcare institution, or healthcare
payor shall not be civilly, criminally, or administratively liable for the licensed
healthcare professional’s, healthcare institution’s, or healthcare payor’s exercise of
conscience.
(2) A healthcare institution shall not be civilly, criminally, or
administratively liable for the exercise of conscience by a licensed healthcare
professional employed, contracted, or granted admitting privileges by the healthcare
institution.
D.(1) No employer of a licensed healthcare professional shall take adverse
action against the healthcare professional solely for providing a healthcare treatment,
procedure, or product with the informed consent of the patient and within the scope
of the professional’s lawful practice.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection apply regardless of whether the
treatment, procedure, or product is approved by a governmental or medical authority
provided the healthcare professional acts in accordance with applicable standards of
care, state, and federal law.
E.(1) No employer, healthcare professional licensing board, healthcare
payor, or state governmental entity shall take adverse action against a licensed
healthcare professional for expressing, in a private or public capacity, a professional
opinion related to healthcare if the opinion is made in good faith and within the
scope of the professional’s competence.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1118 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1121
(2) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a licensing board
from regulating fraudulent, knowingly false, or grossly negligent statements in
accordance with state and federal law.
F.(1) A healthcare licensing board or regulatory agency shall not impose
disciplinary action against a licensed healthcare professional solely for expressing
a professional opinion or furnishing supporting medical literature if such conduct
does not constitute fraud or gross negligence.
(2) Prior to imposing disciplinary action based upon a professional statement
or treatment decision, the licensing board shall provide notice and an opportunity for
the healthcare professional to respond in accordance with administrative procedures
and due process requirements.